Florida, session 2026, SB260.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 39 40 Section 1.âPresent paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of 41 section 125.0103, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph 42 (f), and a new paragraph (d) and paragraph (e) are added to that 43 subsection, to read: 44 125.0103âOrdinances and rules imposing price controls.â 45 (1) 46 (d)1.âCounties shall establish a daily administration 47 storage fee for the proper storage of electric vehicles, as 48 defined in s. 320.01(36), which have been involved in a crash 49 that results in visible damage to the batteries or battery 50 compartment, or when the batteries or battery compartment have 51 been submerged, for any length of time, in salt water, and until 52 the appropriate local agency has inspected and verified that the 53 damaged battery is safe and not in danger of starting a fire. 54 The daily administration storage fee for proper storage of an 55 electric vehicle may be up to three times the amount established 56 under paragraph (c) and applies in the event that the electric 57 vehicle owner or operator is incapacitated, is unavailable, 58 leaves the procurement of wrecker service to the law enforcement 59 officer at the scene, or otherwise does not consent to the 60 removal of the electric vehicle. Such fee may not be charged 61 unless the electric vehicle is properly stored as defined in 62 this paragraph. 63 2.âFor purposes of this paragraph, the term: 64 a.ââDaily administration storage feeâ means a fee imposed 65 by a wrecker service or towing-storage or wrecker operator for 66 administrative costs for storing a damaged or submerged electric 67 vehicle in order to provide proper storage of the damaged or 68 submerged electric vehicle. 69 b.ââProper storageâ means the damaged electric vehicle is 70 separated from combustibles and structures by at least 50 feet 71 on all sides or is surrounded by a barrier of earth, steel, 72 concrete, or solid masonry. 73 (e)1.âBeginning January 1, 2027, and ending December 31, 74 2028, a wrecker service or towing-storage wrecker or operator 75 shall collect and submit to the Division of State Fire Marshal 76 data relating to the storage of damaged or submerged electric 77 vehicles as described in subparagraph (d)1. The State Fire 78 Marshal shall create a form for such data, which must include, 79 but is not limited to, all of the following information: 80 a.âThe vehicle identification number. 81 b.âA description of the damage to the electric vehicle. 82 c.âThe remaining percentage of battery charge, if known or 83 reasonably ascertainable. 84 d.âThe dates during which the electric vehicle was stored 85 by the wrecker service or towing-storage or wrecker operator. 86 e.âAny fire-related incidents during the time the electric 87 vehicle was stored. 88 f.âAny other information deemed relevant by the State Fire 89 Marshal. 90 2.âBy March 1, 2029, the State Fire Marshal shall submit a 91 report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the 92 House of Representatives with a summary of the data received 93 pursuant to subparagraph 1. The report must assess the potential 94 threat of fire posed when storing an electric vehicle with 95 battery damage and make recommendations on the best practices to 96 reduce the threat of fire during such storage. 97 3.âThis paragraph expires on July 1, 2029. 98 Section 2.âPresent paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of 99 section 166.043, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph 100 (f), and a new paragraph (d) and paragraph (e) are added to that 101 subsection, to read: 102 166.043âOrdinances and rules imposing price controls.â 103 (1) 104 (d)1.âMunicipalities may establish a daily administration 105 storage fee for the proper storage of electric vehicles, as 106 defined in s. 320.01(36), which have been involved in a crash 107 that results in visible damage to the batteries or battery 108 compartment, or when the batteries or battery compartment have 109 been submerged, for any length of time, in salt water, and until 110 the appropriate local agency has inspected and verified that the 111 damaged battery is safe and not in danger of starting a fire. 112 The daily administration storage fee for proper storage of an 113 electric vehicle may be up to three times the amount established 114 under paragraph (c) and applies in the event that the electric 115 vehicle owner or operator is incapacitated, is unavailable, 116 leaves the procurement of wrecker service to the law enforcement 117 officer at the scene, or otherwise does not consent to the 118 removal of the electric vehicle. Such fee may not be charged 119 unless the electric vehicle is properly stored as defined in 120 this paragraph. If a municipality enacts an ordinance 121 establishing a daily administration storage fee as defined in 122 this paragraph, a countyâs ordinance establishing a daily 123 administration storage fee under s. 125.0103(1)(d) does not 124 apply within such municipality. 125 2.âFor purposes of this paragraph, the term: 126 a.ââDaily administration storage feeâ means a fee imposed 127 by a wrecker service or towing-storage or wrecker operator for 128 administrative costs for storing a damaged or submerged electric 129 vehicle in order to provide proper storage of the damaged or 130 submerged electric vehicle. 131 b.ââProper storageâ means the damaged electric vehicle is 132 separated from combustibles and structures by at least 50 feet 133 on all sides or is surrounded by a barrier of earth, steel, 134 concrete, or solid masonry. 135 (e)1.âBeginning January 1, 2027, and ending December 31, 136 2028, a wrecker service or towing-storage wrecker or operator 137 shall collect and submit to the Division of State Fire Marshal 138 data relating to the storage of damaged or submerged electric 139 vehicles as described in subparagraph (d)1. The State Fire 140 Marshal shall create a form for such data, which must include, 141 but is not limited to, all of the following information: 142 a.âThe vehicle identification number. 143 b.âA description of the damage to the electric vehicle. 144 c.âThe remaining percentage of battery charge, if known or 145 reasonably ascertainable. 146 d.âThe dates during which the electric vehicle was stored 147 by the wrecker service or towing-storage or wrecker operator. 148 e.âAny fire-related incidents during the time the electric 149 vehicle was stored. 150 f.âAny other information deemed relevant by the State Fire 151 Marshal. 152 2.âBy March 1, 2029, the State Fire Marshal shall submit a 153 report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the 154 House of Representatives with a summary of the data received 155 pursuant to subparagraph 1. The report must assess the potential 156 threat of fire posed when storing an electric vehicle with 157 battery damage and make recommendations on the best practices to 158 reduce the threat of fire during such storage. 159 3.âThis paragraph expires on July 1, 2029. 160 Section 3.âSection 324.0222, Florida Statutes, is created 161 to read: 162 324.0222âStorage of electric vehicles; coverage.âNothing in 163 s. 125.0103 or s. 166.043 relating to the storage of electric 164 vehicles requires a motor vehicle insurer to pay any costs 165 beyond costs covered pursuant to a contract with its insured. 166 Section 4.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 167 713.78, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 168 713.78âLiens for recovering, towing, or storing vehicles 169 and vessels.â 170 (2)(a)âA towing-storage operator may charge the owner or 171 operator of a vehicle or vessel only the following fees for, or 172 incidental to, the recovery, removal, or storage of the vehicle 173 or vessel: 174 1.âAny reasonable fee for service, including any daily 175 administration storage fee, specifically authorized under s. 176 125.0103 or s. 166.043 by ordinance, resolution, regulation, or 177 rule of the county or municipality in which the service is 178 performed. 179 2.âAny reasonable fee for service specifically authorized 180 by the Division of Florida Highway Patrol of the Department of 181 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles under s. 321.051(2). 182 3.âAny reasonable fee for service as agreed upon in writing 183 between a towing-storage operator and the owner of a vehicle or 184 vessel. 185 4.âAny lien release administrative fee as set forth in 186 paragraph (15)(a). 187 5.âAny reasonable administrative fee or charge imposed by a 188 county or municipality pursuant to s. 125.01047, s. 166.04465, 189 or s. 323.002 upon the registered owner or other legally 190 authorized person in control of a vehicle or vessel. 191 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.